Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GRANTS FOR LEAD RISK ASSESSMENTS.new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for grants to the Minneapolis Health Department and the St. Paul-Ramsey County Public Health Department to conduct lead risk assessments under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.9504, for children with elevated blood levels. Of this appropriation: new text end new text begin (1) $250,000 is for a grant to the Minneapolis Health Department; and new text end new text begin (2) $250,000 is for a grant to the St. Paul-Ramsey County Public Health Department. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not use any of this appropriation for administration. new text end